Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB891.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-IKEYSTONE STATE APPRENTICESHIP TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified employer." A qualified employer that has received a final certificate of eligibility from the department after the department has determined that the qualified employer has fulfilled all eligibility criteria to participate in the program. The final certificate of eligibility shall state the actual amount of tax credit that a certified employer is entitled to claim and the allocation year of the tax credit."Construction." The act of constructing, reconstructing, altering, maintaining, moving, rehabilitating, repairing, renovating, fabricating, servicing or demolishing a building, structure, improvement or component, or an act relating to the excavation of or other development or improvement to land."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Disadvantaged youth." An individual who is:(1) Between 16 and 24 years of age when the individual begins an apprenticeship.(2) Low-income or at-risk, as those terms are defined by the department."Mentor." An individual who provides instruction, guidance and support to the apprentice on a regular basis throughout the apprentice's completion of the apprenticeship as the apprentice seeks employment in the field or industry of the apprenticeship."Participating employer." A qualified employer that has applied to participate in the program and received a preliminary certificate of tax credit from the department. The preliminary certificate shall state the maximum amount of the tax credit that the employer may be able to claim if the applicant becomes a certified employer.20250HB0891PN0931 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Program." The Keystone State Apprenticeship Tax Credit Program established under section 1802-I."Qualified apprentice." An individual employed by a participating employer in a full-time position for at least six months of a calendar year under a qualified apprenticeship agreement with a qualified employer. An individual employed by a qualified employer shall not be deemed a qualified apprentice if the individual has not completed the apprenticeship training program within one year of the expected date of completion of the program."Qualified apprenticeship agreement." An apprenticeship agreement that has been registered with and approved by the department for a trade other than a construction trade."Qualified employer." An employer that participates in a department-approved apprenticeship program."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.Section 1802-I. Powers and duties of secretary.(a) Establishment.--The Keystone State Apprenticeship Tax Credit Program is established to provide tax incentives to certified employers for employing qualified apprentices under a qualified apprenticeship agreement registered with the department under section 4 of the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act.(b) Allocation.--The secretary may allocate up to $10,000,000 in tax credits annually beginning July 1, 2025, and ending on July 1, 2030. Any unused annual allocation of tax credits shall be made available in each of the subsequent years before 2030.(c) Guidelines and criteria.--20250HB0891PN0931 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The secretary shall establish guidelines and criteria that specify requirements for qualified employers to participate in the program, including criteria for certifying qualified apprentices.(2) The secretary may give preference to qualified employers that hire and train disadvantaged youth through qualified apprenticeship agreements and qualified employers that are engaged in demand occupations or industries or in regional growth sectors, including those identified by the department, such as clean energy, health care, technology, including software engineering and web development, advanced manufacturing and conservation.(3) The secretary may give preference to employers that employ apprentices in newly established apprenticeship programs.(4) The secretary may take the following factors into consideration when evaluating whether to approve an application in a year subsequent to the year in which a qualified employer was determined to be a certified employer:(i) The length of the qualified apprenticeship agreement into which the certified employer has entered.(ii) The number of apprentices who have graduated from the apprenticeship program to which the qualified apprentice employed by the certified employer belongs.(iii) The number of apprentices in the apprenticeship program who the qualified employer has hired.(iv) Other factors the secretary deems relevant.Section 1803-I. Keystone State Apprenticeship Tax Credit.(a) Eligibility.--20250HB0891PN0931 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A certified employer shall be entitled to a tax credit against income or franchise tax for each qualified apprentice. The base tax credit allowed under the program shall be computed as follows:(i) Two thousand dollars for each first-year apprentice.(ii) Three thousand dollars for each second-year apprentice.(iii) Four thousand dollars for each third-year apprentice.(iv) Five thousand dollars for each fourth-year apprentice.(v) Six thousand dollars for each fifth-year apprentice.(2) The apprentice's status under paragraph (1) shall be determined on the last day of the calendar year or, if the apprentice is no longer employed by the participating employer on the last day of the calendar year, on the last day of the apprentice's employment with the participating employer.(b) Disadvantaged youth tax credit.--(1) In lieu of the tax credit specified in subsection (a), for each qualified apprentice who is considered a disadvantaged youth for each tax year:(i) Five thousand dollars for each first-year apprentice.(ii) Six thousand dollars for each second-year apprentice.(iii) Seven thousand dollars for each third-year, fourth-year or fifth-year apprentice.20250HB0891PN0931 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The qualified apprentice's status under paragraph (1) shall be determined on the last day of the calendar year or, if the qualified apprentice is no longer employed by the participating employer on the last day of the calendar year, on the last day of the apprentice's employment with the participating employer. If a disadvantaged youth under 25 years of age begins an apprenticeship, a certified employer shall be eligible to continue to receive the tax credit for the disadvantaged youth under this subsection until that apprentice completes the apprenticeship.(c) Increase.--If an apprentice has been trained in the apprentice's trade by a mentor for the entirety of the calendar year, the base tax credit amounts described in subsection (a) shall be increased by $500.(d) Other tax credit.--A certified employer shall not be allowed a tax credit under this article for an apprentice if the apprentice is the basis for any other State tax credit.Section 1804-I. Application and approval.(a) Application.--To participate in the program, a qualified employer must submit to the secretary an application in a form prescribed by the secretary. As part of the application, a qualified employer must:(1) Agree to allow the Department of Revenue to share the applicant's tax information with the department. Information shared as a result of this agreement is exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) Allow the department and the department's agents access to any and all books and records the department may require to monitor compliance.20250HB0891PN0931 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Approval.--After reviewing a qualified employer's completed application and determining that the qualified employer meets the eligibility conditions specified in this article and any applicable regulations promulgated by the secretary, the department may admit the applicant into the program as a participating employer and provide the applicant with a preliminary certificate of eligibility establishing the qualified employer as a participating employer and stating the maximum amount of tax credit for which the applicant is eligible.Section 1805-I. Final report.To receive a final certificate of tax credit, the participating employer must annually submit a final report to the secretary in a form prescribed by the department. The report must demonstrate that the applicant has satisfied all eligibility requirements under this article and provided all the information necessary for the secretary to compute an actual amount of tax credit allowed for that calendar year, notwithstanding the fact that a participating employer's taxable year may be a fiscal year. The final certificate of eligibility shall state the actual amount of tax credit that a certified employer is entitled to claim and the allocation year of the tax credit.Section 1806-I. Certification of employer.(a) Certification.--After review and approval of the final report, the secretary shall certify the participating employer as a certified employer and issue a final certificate of tax credit. The certificate shall include the following information:(1) The name and employer identification number of the certified employer.20250HB0891PN0931 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The actual amount of tax credit to which the certified employer is entitled for that calendar year, which actual amount cannot exceed the amount of tax credit listed on the preliminary certificate but may be less than the amount.(3) The allocation year of the tax credit.(4) Any other information deemed necessary by the secretary.(b) Taxable year.--If a certified employer's taxable year is a fiscal year, the certified employer shall be entitled to claim the tax credit on the return for the fiscal year that includes the last day of the calendar year covered by the final certificate of tax credit.Section 1807-I. Annual report.(a) Report.--The secretary shall annually publish a report containing the following information:(1) The names and addresses of certified employers issued a final certificate of eligibility under this article.(2) The work location of each apprentice generating a tax credit.(3) The amount of Keystone State Apprenticeship Tax Credits allowed to the certified employer as specified on the final certificate of eligibility.(4) The number of each of the first-year apprentices, second-year apprentices, third-year apprentices, fourth-year apprentices and fifth-year apprentices and which individuals are considered disadvantaged youth.(b) Recommendations and publication.--The secretary shall include in the report under subsection (a) the relevant industries of certified employers and recommendations for 20250HB0891PN0931 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legislative or other action to further the intent and purpose of the program. The report shall be published by December 31 on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Promotion.--The secretary shall promote, publish and disseminate information concerning the Keystone State Apprenticeship Tax Credit and other available funding, particularly targeting industries and fields of business not currently taking advantage of apprenticeships.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0891PN0931 - 9 - 123456789